Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1216.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Residential Rental Application Fees.--(a) A landlord or a landlord's agent may not charge a fee in connection with an application to enter into a rental agreement for a residential dwelling unit in an amount greater than the lesser of:(1) the actual cost of a background check conducted under subsection (b); or(2) fifty dollars ($50).1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) A landlord or a landlord's agent may use a fee under subsection (a) only to conduct a background check of an applicant. A background check under this subsection shall be limited to a criminal history record information check and a credit check.(c) A landlord may not adopt or enforce a policy that excludes all applicants with a criminal history. In determining whether an applicant's criminal history indicates a demonstrable risk to the safety of residents or property, a landlord shall make an individualized assessment and consider all of the following:(1) The nature and gravity of the offense.(2) The duration of time that has elapsed since the conviction.(3) The duration of time that has elapsed since the expiration or completion of the sentence.(d) Any attempted waiver of this section by an applicant or tenant by contract or otherwise shall be void and unenforceable.(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or require a person to charge a fee in connection with an application to enter into a rental agreement for commercial or other nonresidential property.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1216PN1517 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223